Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1180SV (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 600 Section 1. Section 331.465, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. If the real property served by a 3 connection to storm water drainage system services retains at 4 least one and one-half inches of standing water at any point 5 during a billing cycle, the board shall not charge the real 6 property for storm water drainage system services for the 7 billing cycle. 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. If the real property served by a 9 connection to storm water drainage system services contains 10 within the property a retention pond for storm water purposes 11 that meets the requirements provided in the national pollutant 12 discharge elimination system general permit no. 2 as issued by 13 the department of natural resources, the board shall not charge 14 the real property for storm water drainage system services. 15 Sec. 2. Section 358C.15, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 16 following new subsections: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. If the real property served by a 18 connection to storm water drainage system services retains at 19 least one and one-half inches of standing water at any point 20 during a billing cycle, the district shall not charge the real 21 property for storm water drainage system services for the 22 billing cycle. 23 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. If the real property served by a 24 connection to storm water drainage system services contains 25 within the property a retention pond for storm water purposes 26 that meets the requirements provided in the national pollutant 27 discharge elimination system general permit no. 2 as issued 28 by the department of natural resources, the district shall 29 not charge the real property for storm water drainage system 30 services. 31 Sec. 3. Section 384.84, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 32 following new subsections: 33 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. If the real property served by a 34 connection to storm water drainage system services retains at 35 -1- LSB 1180SV (2) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 S.F. 600 least one and one-half inches of standing water at any point 1 during a billing cycle, the governing body shall not charge the 2 real property for storm water drainage system services for the 3 billing cycle. 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 13. If the real property served by a 5 connection to storm water drainage system services contains 6 within the property a retention pond for storm water purposes 7 that meets the requirements provided in the national pollutant 8 discharge elimination system general permit no. 2 as issued by 9 the department of natural resources, the governing body shall 10 not charge the real property for storm water drainage system 11 services. 12